Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RADAR INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation, in consultation with the commissioner of public safety, shall make grants to political subdivisions of the state, including airport authorities and airport commissions, for the acquisition, design, construction, and installation of mobile radar infrastructure and equipment to enhance airspace and marine surveillance. Projects supported by this appropriation shall provide statewide surveillance of low altitude airspace and navigable waterways, detect and track intruding aircraft and vessels, assist with drone traffic management and emergency response, and enhance collision and obstruction avoidance for publicly owned airports and public waters. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin (a) Grants under this section may be used for the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) procurement and installation of radar sensors capable of detecting and tracking small, low radar cross section targets to track aircraft, unmanned aerial vehicles, and vessels across Minnesota's airspace and waterways; new text end new text begin (2) construction of radar towers; acquisition or leasing of temporary or mobile towers, shelters, and power infrastructure; installation of communications networks such as fiber optic lines or secure wireless links to allow real time remote display, alerting, and control; new text end new text begin (3) integration with existing surveillance and air traffic systems, including automatic identification system (AIS) and automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast (ADS-B) data, and installation of ancillary equipment, including cameras, forward looking infrared devices, and other sensors for consolidated situational awareness; and new text end new text begin (4) site acquisition and improvement for radar installations, including grading, foundations, and access roads. new text end new text begin (b) Money from a grant may also be used for training and technical support necessary to commission and operate the capital project. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the purposes of this section. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end